Utah statutes.
61-2g-311.   State-licensed appraiser -- Authority and qualifications.

(1)  A state-licensed appraiser is authorized to appraise complex and noncomplex 1-4 family residential units in this state having a transaction value permitted under the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, and related federal regulations.

(2)  A state-licensed appraiser is authorized to appraise vacant or unimproved land having a transaction value permitted under the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, and related federal regulations that is utilized for 1-4 family purposes or for which the highest and best use is 1-4 family purposes and subdivisions for which a development analysis/appraisal is not necessary.

(3)  A state-licensed appraiser may not issue a certified appraisal report.

(4)  To qualify as a state-licensed appraiser, an applicant must:

(a)  be of good moral character;

(b)  demonstrate honesty, competency, integrity, and truthfulness;

(c)  pass the licensing examination with a satisfactory score as determined by the Appraisal Qualification Board;

(d)  successfully complete not less than 150 classroom hours in courses of study that relate to:

(i)  real estate appraisal;

(ii)  the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice; and

(iii)  ethical rules to be observed by a real estate appraiser as required by Section 61-2g-403; and

(e)  possess the minimum number of hours of experience in real property appraisal as established by rule.

(5)  The courses of study under Subsection (4)(d) shall be conducted by:

(a)  a college or university;

(b)  a community or junior college;

(c)  a real estate appraisal or real estate related organization;

(d)  a state or federal agency or commission;

(e)  a proprietary school;

(f)  a provider approved by a state certification and licensing agency; or

(g)  the Appraisal Foundation or its boards.

